Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 11.
SCHOOL TAX (CONST., ART. 14, § 3, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 14, § 3, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1925 regular session (see Acts 1925, p. 1090), was voted upon at the general election on October 5, 1926, and adopted by a vote of 97,502 for and 40,837 against.

Ark. Const., Art. 14, § 3, as amended by Ark. Const. Amend. 11, was further amended by Ark. Const. Amend. 40 and Ark. Const. Amend. 74. See notes to Ark. Const., Art. 14, § 3.